Hawaii statutes.
[§147-125] Rules. The department shall
have the necessary powers to carry out and effectuate the purposes of this
part, and, subject to chapter 91, may adopt rules with respect to:

(1) Standards for grades, genetic purity, identity,
quality, and condition of seed;

(2) Procedures for certifying seed; and

(3) Other matters necessary to carry out the purposes
of this part. [L 2003, c 49, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next